North Carolina statutes. Chapter 59. Partnership.
Article 3B. Registered Limited Liability Partnerships.

§ 59-84.2.
Registered limited liability partnerships.

A partnership whose internal affairs are governed by the laws of this State, other than a limited partnership, may become a registered limited liability partnership by filing with the Secretary of State an application stating all of the following:

The name of the partnership.

The street address, and the mailing address if different from the street address, of its principal office and the county in which the principal office is located.

The name and street address, and the mailing address if different from the street address, of the partnership’s registered agent and registered office for service of process.

The county in this State in which the registered office is located.

, (6) Repealed by Session Laws 2001-387, s. 156(b), effective January 1, 2002.

(7)

The fiscal year end of the partnership.

(a1)

The terms and conditions on which a partnership becomes a limited liability partnership must be approved in the manner provided in the partnership agreement; provided, however, if the partnership agreement does not contain any such provision, the terms and conditions shall be approved (i) in the case of a
partnership having a partnership agreement that expressly considers obligations to contribute to the partnership, in the manner necessary to amend those provisions, or (ii) in any other case, in the manner necessary to amend the partnership agreement.

through (f) Repealed by Session Laws 2001-387, s. 156(b), effective January 1, 2002.

(f1)

A partnership becomes a registered limited liability partnership when its application for registration becomes effective.

(g)

The status of a registered limited liability partnership and the liability of its partners is not affected by errors or later changes in the information required to be contained in the application for registration.

(h)

A partnership shall promptly amend its registration to reflect any change in the information contained in its application for registration, other than changes that are properly included in other documents filed with the Secretary of State. A registration is amended by filing a certificate of amendment with the Secretary of State. The certificate of amendment shall set forth:

The name of the partnership as reflected on the application for registration.

The date of filing of the application for registration.

The amendment to the application for registration.

(i)

Each registered limited liability partnership must maintain a registered office and registered agent as required by Article 4 of Chapter 55D of the General Statutes and is subject to service on the Secretary of State under that Article.

(j)

A partnership may cancel its registration by filing a certificate of cancellation with the Secretary of State. The certificate of cancellation shall set forth:

(1)

The name of the partnership as reflected on the application for registration;

(2)

The date of filing of the application for registration;

(3)

A mailing address to which the Secretary of State may mail a copy of any process served on the Secretary of State under this subsection;

A commitment to file with the Secretary of State a statement of any subsequent change in its mailing address; and

The effective date and time of cancellation if it is not to be effective at the time of filing the certificate.Cancellation of registration terminates the authority of the partnership’s registered agent to accept service of process, notice, or demand, and appoints the Secretary of State as agent to accept service on behalf of the partnership with respect to any action or proceeding based upon any cause of action arising in this State, or arising out of business transacted in this State, during the time the partnership was registered as a registered limited liability partnership. Service on the Secretary of State of any such process, notice, or demand shall be made by delivering to and leaving with the Secretary of State, or with any clerk authorized by the Secretary of State to accept service of process, duplicate copies of such process, notice, or demand and the fee required by

G.S. 59-35.2

. Upon receipt of process, notice, or demand in the manner provided in this section, the Secretary of State shall immediately mail a copy of the process, notice, or demand by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the partnership at the mailing address designated pursuant to this subsection.

(k)

If a registered limited liability partnership is dissolved but its business is continued by some of its partners with or without others in a new partnership under the same name, then (i) the new partnership shall automatically succeed to the registration of the dissolved original partnership as a registered limited liability partnership and (ii) the dissolved original partnership shall be deemed to be registered as a registered limited liability partnership until the winding up of its affairs is completed.

History.

1993, c. 354, s. 5; 1999-362, ss. 6, 7; 2000-140, ss. 53, 101(p); 2001-358, s. 51(a); 2001-387, ss. 118, 156, 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6; 2002-58, s. 5.

§ 59-84.3.
Name of registered limited liability partnerships.

A registered limited liability partnership’s name must meet the requirements of

G.S. 55D-20

and

G.S. 55D-21

.

History.

1993, c. 354, s. 5; 1999-362, ss. 6, 8; 2001-358, s. 39; 2001-387, ss. 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6.

§ 59-84.4.
Annual report for Secretary of State.

Each registered limited liability partnership and each foreign limited liability partnership authorized to transact business in this State shall deliver to the Secretary of State for filing an annual report, in a form prescribed by the Secretary of State, that sets forth all of the following:

The name of the registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership and the state or country under whose law it is formed.

The street address, and the mailing address if different from the street address, of the registered office, the county in which the registered office is located, and the name of its registered agent at that office in this State, and a statement of any change of the registered office or registered agent, or both.

The street address and telephone number of its principal office.

A brief description of the nature of its business.

The fiscal year end of the partnership.

If the information contained in the most recently filed annual report has not changed, a certification to that effect may be made instead of setting forth the information required by subdivisions (2) through (4) of this subsection. The Secretary of State shall make available the form required to file an annual report.

(a1)

The Secretary of State shall also provide appropriate space and instructions on the annual report form for a registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership to voluntarily indicate whether or not it is a veteran-owned small business or a service-disabled veteran-owned small business.

Information in the annual report must be current as of the date the annual report is executed on behalf of the registered limited liability partnership or the foreign limited liability partnership.

The annual report shall be delivered to the Secretary of State by the fifteenth day of the fourth month following the close of the registered or foreign limited liability partnership’s fiscal year.

If an annual report does not contain the information required by this section, the Secretary of State shall promptly notify the reporting registered or foreign limited liability partnership in writing and return the report to it for correction. If the report is corrected to contain the information required by this section and delivered to the Secretary of State within 30 days after the effective date of notice, it is deemed to be timely filed.

Amendments to any previously filed annual report may be filed with the Secretary of State at any time for the purpose of correcting, updating, or augmenting the information contained in the annual report.

The Secretary of State may revoke the registration of a registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership if the Secretary of State determines that:

The registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership has not paid, within 60 days after they are due, any penalties, fees, or other payments due under this Chapter;

The registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership does not deliver its annual report to the Secretary of State on or before the date it is due;

The registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership has been without a registered agent or registered office in this State for 60 days or more; or

The registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership does not notify the Secretary of State within 60 days of the change, resignation, or discontinuance that its registered agent or registered office has been changed, that its registered agent has resigned, or that its registered office has been discontinued.

If the Secretary of State determines that one or more grounds exist under subsection (f) of this section for revoking the registration of the registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership, the Secretary of State shall mail the registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership written notice of that determination. If, within 60 days after the notice is mailed, the registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership does not correct each ground for revocation or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the Secretary of State that each ground does not exist, the Secretary of State shall revoke the registration of a registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership by signing a certificate of revocation that recites the ground or grounds for revocation and its effective date. The Secretary of State shall file the original certificate of revocation and mail a copy to the registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership.

A registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership whose registration is revoked under this section may apply to the Secretary of State for reinstatement. If, at the time the registered limited liability partnership applies for reinstatement, the name of the registered limited liability partnership is not distinguishable from the name of another entity authorized to be used under

G.S. 55D-21

, then the registered limited liability partnership must change its name to a name that is distinguishable upon the records of the Secretary of State from the name of the other entity before the Secretary of State may prepare a certificate of reinstatement. The procedures for reinstatement and for the appeal of any denial of the registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership’s application for reinstatement shall be the same procedures applicable to business corporations under

G.S. 55-14-22

, 55-14-23, and 55-14-24. The effect of reinstatement of a limited liability partnership shall be the same as for a corporation under

G.S. 55-14-22

.

History.

1999-362, s. 9; 2001-387, s. 119; 2001-390, s. 13; 2017-90, s. 3(a).

§ 59-84.5.
Report of veteran-owned small businesses and service-disabled veteran-owned small businesses.

Using the information reported pursuant to G.S. 59-84.4(a1), the Secretary of State shall compile summary information on an aggregate basis about the number of veteran-owned small businesses and the number of service-disabled veteran-owned small businesses reporting in this State. The Secretary of State shall annually report this summary information to the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs by March 1 of each year.

History.

2017-90, s. 3(b).